North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 5. Food and Nutrition Services.

§ 108A-51.
Authorization for Food and Nutrition Services.

The Department is authorized to establish a statewide food and nutrition services program as authorized by the Congress of the United States. The Department of Health and Human Services is designated as the State agency responsible for the supervision of the food and nutrition services program. The boards of county commissioners through the county departments of social services are held responsible for the administration and operation of the food and nutrition services program.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2007-97, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-97, s. 9, effective June 20, 2007, substituted “Food and Nutrition Services” for “Food Stamp Program” in the section heading; substituted “and nutrition services” for “stamp” in the first sentence; substituted “the food and nutrition services program” for “such programs” in the second sentence; and substituted “food and nutrition services program” for “programs” in the third sentence.

§ 108A-51.1.
Prohibition on certain waivers.

Except for waivers for the Disaster Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program sought for an area that has received a Presidential disaster declaration of Individual Assistance from the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the Department shall not seek waivers to time limits established by federal law for food and nutrition benefits for able-bodied adults without dependents required to fulfill work requirements to qualify for those benefits.

History.

2015-294, s. 16(a).

§ 108A-52.
Determination of eligibility.

Any person who believes that he or another person is eligible to receive electronic food and nutrition benefits may apply for such assistance to the county department of social services in the county in which the applicant resides. The application shall be made in such form and shall contain such information as the Social Services Commission may require. Upon receipt of an application for electronic food and nutrition benefits, the county department of social services shall make a prompt evaluation or investigation of the facts alleged in the application in order to determine the applicant’s eligibility for such assistance and to obtain such other information as the Department may require. Upon the completion of such investigation, the county department of social services shall, within a reasonable period of time, determine eligibility.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2007-97, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-97, s. 10, effective June 20, 2007, substituted “electronic food and nutrition benefits” for “food stamps” twice in the section.

§ 108A-53.
Fraudulent misrepresentation.

Any person, whether provider or recipient or person representing himself as such, who knowingly obtains or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person to obtain by means of making a willfully false statement or representation or by impersonation or by failing to disclose material facts or in any manner not authorized by this Part or the regulations issued pursuant thereto, transfers with intent to defraud any electronic food and nutrition benefit to which that person is not entitled in the amount of four hundred dollars ($400.00) or less shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Whoever knowingly obtains or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person to obtain by means of making a willfully false statement or representation or by impersonation or by failing to disclose material facts or in any manner not authorized by this Part or the regulations issued pursuant thereto, transfers with intent to defraud any electronic food and nutrition benefit to which he is not entitled in an amount more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) shall be guilty of a Class I felony.

Whoever presents, or causes to be presented, electronic food and nutrition benefits for payment or redemption, knowing the same to have been received, transferred, or used in any manner in violation of the provisions of this Part or the regulations issued pursuant to this Part shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Whoever receives any electronic food and nutrition benefits for any consumable item knowing that such benefits were procured fraudulently under subsections (a) and/or (b) of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Whoever receives any electronic food and nutrition benefits for any consumable item whose exchange is prohibited by the United States Department of Agriculture shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1991, c. 523, s. 5; 1993, c. 539, ss. 814, 1299; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 507, s. 19.5(n); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 24.31(a); 2007-97, s. 11; 2008-187, s. 18.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-97, s. 11, effective June 20, 2007 in subsection (a), substituted “electronic food and nutrition benefit” for “food stamps or authorization cards” in the first sentence, and substituted “electronic and nutrition benefit” for “food stamps or authorization cards” in the second sentence; substituted “electronic food and nutrition benefits” for “food stamps or authorization cards” in subsection (b); substituted “electronic food and nutrition benefits” for “food stamps” in subsections (c) and (d), and substituted “benefits” for “food stamps” in subsection (c).

Session Laws 2008-187, s. 18, effective August 7, 2008, inserted “food” following “defraud any electronic” in subsection (a).

§ 108A-53.1.
Illegal possession or use of electronic food and nutrition benefits.

Any person who knowingly buys, sells, distributes, or possesses with the intent to sell, or distribute electronic food and nutrition benefits or access devices in any manner contrary to that authorized by this Part or the regulations issued pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a Class H felony.

Any person who knowingly uses, transfers, acquires, alters, or possesses electronic food and nutrition benefits or access devices in any manner contrary to that authorized by this Part or the regulations issued pursuant thereto, other than as set forth in subsection (a) of this section, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if the value of such electronic food and nutrition benefits or access devices is less than one hundred dollars ($100.00), or a Class A1 misdemeanor if the value of such electronic food and nutrition benefits or access devices is equal to at least one hundred dollars ($100.00) but less than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or a Class I felony if the value of such electronic food and nutrition benefits or access devices is equal to at least five hundred dollars ($500.00) but less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or a Class H felony if the value of such electronic food and nutrition benefits or access devices equals or exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History.

1997-497, s. 2; 2007-97, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-97, s. 12, effective June 20, 2007, substituted “electronic food and nutrition benefits” for “food stamps” in the section heading and substituted “electronic food and nutrition benefits” for “food stamp coupons, authorization cards” throughout this section.